Utah statutes.
10-8-35.   Fences, cattle guards and street crossings -- Duty of railroads.

They may require railroad companies to fence their respective railroads or any portion of the same, and to construct cattle guards, crossings of streets and public roads, and keep the same in repair within the limits of the corporation.

